Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5089.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 106. (1) The portion of highway M-60 in Jackson County beginning at Fairway Drive and continuing west to Emerson Road shall be known as the "Sergeant Matthew R. Soper Memorial Highway". (2) The portion of highway M-60 in Jackson County beginning at Emerson Road and continuing west to North Cross Road shall be known as the "WWII Veterans Lynford Graham, Melvin King, and Vernon Smalley Memorial Highway". (3) The portion of highway M-60 in Jackson County beginning at North Cross Road and continuing west to North Main Street shall be known as the "Vietnam War Veterans Timothy Ballinger, Robert Jenks, and James Morgan Memorial Highway". (4) The portion of highway M-60 in Jackson County beginning at North Main Street and continuing west to Van Wert Road shall be known as the "Operation Iraqi Freedom Veteran Donald Wheeler Jr. Memorial Highway".